Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.310

Voting agreements.

(1) Two or more shareholders may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by executing an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section is not subject to the provisions of RCW 23B.07.300.

(2) A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

[ 2020 c 57 s 56; 1989 c 165 s 78.]